Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202670-619
Board of directors; qualifications; eligibility to serve.

(1) The corporate powers of the district shall be vested in and exercised by the board of directors of the district. No person shall be qualified to hold office as a member of the board of directors unless (a) he or she is a registered voter (i) of such chartered territory, (ii) of the subdivision from which a director is to be elected if such chartered territory is subdivided for election purposes as provided in subsection (1), (2), or (3) of section 70-612, or (iii) of one of the combined subdivisions from which directors are to be elected at large as provided in section 70-612 or (b) he or she is a retail customer duly certified in accordance with subsection (3) of section 70-604.03.

(2) No person who is a full-time or part-time employee of the district shall be eligible to serve as a member of the board of directors of that district. A member of a governing body of any one of the municipalities within the areas of the district may not serve on the original board of directors under sections 70-603 to 70-609.

Laws 1933, c. 86, § 5, p. 345;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-705;

Laws 1943, c. 146, § 2(1), p. 518;

R.S.1943, § 70-619;

Laws 1944, Spec. Sess., c. 5, § 1(1), p. 106;

Laws 1957, c. 127, § 2, p. 440;

Laws 1963, c. 396, § 1, p. 1258;

Laws 1967, c. 418, § 6, p. 1288;

Laws 1973, LB 364, § 4;

Laws 1982, LB 198, § 4;

Laws 1983, LB 15, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 2, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 949, § 13;

Laws 1991, LB 3, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 585;

Laws 2013, LB646, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB177, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB565, § 42.

Eligibility, additional requirements, see section 70-610.

District was not estopped to attack constitutionality of a distinct, separate legislative act. May v. City of Kearney, 145 Neb. 475, 17 N.W.2d 448 (1945).